test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aaina_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - āina: # Noun 36 'eng /est hein/fin' - full paradigm
     āina+N+Sg+Nom: āina
     āina+N+Sg+Gen: āina
     āina+N+Sg+Par: ainõ
     āina+N+Sg+Dat: āinan
     āina+N+Sg+Ins: āinaks
     āina+N+Sg+Ill: ainõ
     āina+N+Sg+Ela: āinast
     āina+N+Pl+Nom: āinad
     āina+N+Pl+Gen: āinad
     āina+N+Pl+Par: aiņi
     āina+N+Pl+Dat: āinadõn
     āina+N+Pl+Ins: āinadõks
     āina+N+Pl+Ill: āiniž
     āina+N+Pl+Ela: āinist
